Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter  659, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 1, chapter 112,
Oregon Laws 2022, and section 1, chapter 23, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of  land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 15,500,000
(b) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ......................... $ 10,000,000
(c) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Improvements .................. $ 2,750,000
(d) Dome Building and
Yaquina Hall Improvements ........... $ 1,500,000
(e) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions ............................ $ 2,000,000
(f) Parking Lot Improvements
and EV Charging Station
Expansions ..........................................$ 2,000,000
(g) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation ................... $ 45,000,000
(h) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
Tenant Improvements ....................... $ 77,000,000
(i) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ............ $ 4,000,000
(j) State Facilities Security
and Capital Improvements .............. $ 10,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 1
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 5,373,235
(b) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 4,317,605
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ............................... $ 5,300,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Camp Riverbend Dorm
[Renovation .........................................$ 6,867,101]
Renovation................................ $ 10,367,101
(b) Capital Improvements ...................... $ 6,742,239
(c) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ........................................$ 8,000,000
(d) Tillamook Dorm
[Renovation .........................................$ 10,279,899]
Renovation................................ $ 13,879,899
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ...............................................$ 70,000,000
(b) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ..................................... $ 3,508,206
(5) Oregon State Police:
(a) Central Point Office Expansion ..... $ 33,961,269
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office .............. $ 61,982,733
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ................................ $ 14,261,687
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 12,000,000
(b) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 16,200,000
(c) Region 3-5 Headquarters
[HVAC Upgrades .............................. $ 3,800,000]
HVAC Upgrades ........................ $ 6,050,000
(7) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 320,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Santiam District Office
Replacement .......................................$ 2,500,000
(b) Toledo Facility
Replacement Phase II ...................... $ 1,632,842
(9) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 5,000,000
(10) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 50,000,000
(11) Oregon Health Authority:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 2
(a) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ............................ $ 4,492,750
(b) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets...............................................$ 3,500,000
(12) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing,
Permanent Supportive
Housing................................................$ 410,000,000
(13) Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
(a) Liquor Warehouse
[Conveyor System ............................... $ 15,000,000]
Conveyor System ...................... $ 24,000,000
(b) Liquor Warehouse
[Land and Building ........................... $130,455,048]
Land and Building..................... $121,455,048
(14) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
ADA Restrooms, Fire Alarm
System Replacement and
Windows Upgrade ............................. $ 5,500,000
(15) Judicial Department,
Supreme Court Building
Renovation ..........................................$ 21,700,000
(16) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ......................... $ 19,630,000
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section  2, chapter 23,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the  acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 3,069,187
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Camp Umatilla Barracks
[Facilities .............................................$ 28,243,000]
Facilities ................................... $ 57,743,000
(b) Camp Umatilla Guard Shack .......... $ 1,100,000
(c) Washington County
[Readiness Center .............................. $ 22,700,000]
Readiness Center ...................... $ 26,000,000
SECTION 3.
 Section 2, chapter 597, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 3
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the  acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation:
(a) Aurora Airport Obstruction
Removal and Easement .................... $ 1,386,000
(b) Aurora Airport Runway
17-35 Rehab.........................................$ 2,475,000
(c) Chiloquin Airport
Obstruction Removal ........................ $ 1,188,000
(d) Cottage Grove Airport
EA and Apron Rehab ....................... $ 1,479,500
(e) Lebanon Airport Taxiway
Reconstruct/Drain ............................. $ 4,737,919
(2) Oregon Military Department[ ,]:
(a) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
[Life Safety Improvements ................ $ 5,500,000]
Life Safety Improvements ........ $ 6,710,000
(b) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 3,513,600
(c) Jackson Armory Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 4,000,000
(d) Newport Armory Regional
Emergency Enhancement ......... $ 1,300,000
(e) Pendleton Army Aviation
Support Facility Regional
Emergency Enhancement ......... $ 2,500,000
(f) Salem Army Aviation
Support Facility Regional
Emergency Enhancement ......... $ 3,400,000
(g) Medford Field
Maintenance Shop..................... $ 2,500,000
SECTION 4.
 Section 1, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 1,  chapter 6,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 10,524,000
(b) Justice Building
Exterior Updates ............................... $ 5,000,000
(c) Revenue Building
Electrical System Upgrades ........... $ 10,000,000
(d) Portland State Office
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 4
Building Upgrades ............................ $ 8,600,000
(e) Wilsonville Building
Purchase ..............................................$ 24,000,000
(f) Electric Vehicle Charging
Infrastructure ..................................... $ 3,800,000
(g) Parking Facility Repair
and Upgrades ..................................... $ 2,800,000
(h) Security and Security
Systems................................................$ 2,000,000
(i) Oregon State Fair
Horse Barn .........................................$ 3,000,000
(j) Oregon State Fair
Poultry Barn ......................................$ 2,000,000
(k) Oregon State Fair Facilities
Capital Improvements ...................... $ 5,325,925
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem and Pendleton
Aviation Facility
Emergency Enhancements .............. $ 9,852,000
(b) Salem and Anderson
Readiness Center Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 5,800,000
(c) Jackson Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 4,275,000
(d) Oregon Military Museum ................ $ 2,000,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Tillamook Medical and
[Dental Renovations .......................... $ 1,521,875]
Dental Renovations ................... $ 2,321,875
(b) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation ...................... $ 1,804,000
(c) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Clinic Renovations .............. $ 1,271,202
(d) Control Room Renovations ............. $ 1,772,500
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Radio System Replacement ............. $ 13,998,225
(b) Camera Systems Upgrades .............. $ 8,633,804
(c) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ...............................................$ 24,478,039
(5) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 12,000,000
(b) Central Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 1,883,267
(6) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Prospect State Airport
Runway Reconstruction ................... $ 2,160,000
(b) Aurora State Airport
Run-Up Area Construction ............. $ 205,000
(c) Condon State Airport
Runway Rehabilitation ..................... $ 260,000
(d) Siletz Bay State Airport
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 5
Taxiway Rehabilitation .................... $ 114,000
(7) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(a) Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing ...................... $ 200,000,000
(b) Permanent Supportive
Housing................................................$ 50,000,000
(8) Oregon Judicial Department:
(a) Multnomah County Courthouse
Furnishings and Equipment ............ $ 8,500,000
(b) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation ......................... $ 27,820,000
(9) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol Accessibility
Maintenance and Safety .................. $ 68,050,000
SECTION 5.
 Section 1, chapter 597, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of  land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Various Deferred
Maintenance Projects ...................... $ 15,500,000
(b) Construction Project
Planning ..............................................$ 3,500,000
(c) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ......................... $ 6,500,000
(d) Building Automation Systems ........ $ 5,000,000
(e) Security and Systems
Investment/Upgrades ........................ $ 2,500,000
(f) Portfolio Repositioning .................... $ 11,250,000
(g) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions ............................ $ 2,000,000
(h) Capitol Mall Medium Voltage
Design ..................................................$ 500,000
(i) Parking Lot/EV Charging
Stations................................................$ 3,000,000
(2) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT)/Permanent Supportive
Housing Programs ............................. $ 600,000,000
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem Owen Summers Building
Service Life Extension ..................... $ 2,909,970
(b) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ............... $ 5,500,000
(c) Medford Field Maintenance
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 6
Shop.......................................... $ 5,300,000
(4) Department of State Police:
(a) Central Point Office
Expansion ............................................$ 26,500,000
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office .............. $ 21,320,000
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ................................ $ 7,278,186
(5) Department of Corrections:
(a) Camera System .................................. $ 8,500,000
(b) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ...............................................$ 50,000,000
(c) Wireless Communication
System..................................................$ 12,900,000
(6) Oregon Youth Authority[ ,]:
(a) Capital Improvements -
All Facilities ......................................$ 2,750,000
(b) Oak Creek Youth
Correctional Facility ................. $ 4,000,000
(7) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the
Deaf Capital Improvements ............ $ 3,500,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Klamath Facility Replacement ....... $ 1,500,000
(b) Salem Airport Hangar ..................... $ 2,000,000
(9) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 2,500,000
(10) Oregon Health Authority:
(a) Junction City Single Unit
Remodel ...............................................$ 5,000,000
(b) PLC System Replacement ............... $ 3,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Aurora Airport Obstruction
Removal and Easement .................... $ 154,000
(b) Aurora Airport Runway
17-35 Rehab.........................................$ 275,000
(c) Chiloquin Airport
Obstruction Removal ........................ $ 132,000
(d) Cottage Grove Airport
EA and Apron Rehab ....................... $ 164,389
(e) Lebanon Airport Taxiway
Reconstruct/Drain ............................. $ 526,436
(12) Department of Transportation,
Maintenance Station
Improvements ..................................... $ 38,000,000
(13) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ......................... $ 215,000,000
SECTION 6.
 Section 3, chapter 597, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 7
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of [ $327,713,551]
$333,713,551 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds  from state bonds issued for the benefit of a public
university, pursuant to agreements between the commission and a public university.
SECTION 7.  Section 5, chapter 597, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure limitations authorized  by
the Legislative Assembly for the following projects are extended to the following dates:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Department of Human Services
Building Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(b), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(b) Employment Building Upgrades
(Other Funds) (section 1 (1)(c),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
(c) Electrical Upgrades and
Replacements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(d), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(d) Capitol Mall Parking Structure
Study and Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(e), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(e) Boiler and Heating Upgrades
(Other Funds) (section 1 (1)(g),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
(f) Portland State Office
Building Renovation (Other
Funds) (section 1 (1)(j),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).......................................... June 30, 2025
(2) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (7)(d), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2024
(b) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation (Federal Funds)
(section 2 (4), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2024
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (2)(a), chapter 747,
[Oregon Laws 2017) .......................... June 30, 2024 ]
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... September 30, 2024
(b) Camp Umatilla Regional Training
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 8
Institute Re-Set project (Federal Funds)
(December 14, 2018, Emergency
Board Item No. 25, as amended by
September 25, 2020, Emergency
Board Item No. 33, as amended
by section 10, chapter 659,
[Oregon Laws 2021) .......................... June 30, 2024 ]
Oregon Laws 2021) .................... December 31, 2024
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvements and
Renewal (Other Funds)
(section 1 (4)(a), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(b) Technology Infrastructure
(Other Funds) (section 1 (4)(b),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
(5) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(c), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(b) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(b), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ........................... June 30, 2025
(c) Capital Improvements (Other
Funds) (section 1 (3)(a),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
(6) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, Public University
Capital Construction Bonds
(Other Funds) (section 3,
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
(7) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement
(Other Funds) (section 1 (9),
chapter 747, Oregon Laws
2017).....................................................June 30, 2025
SECTION 8.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 9
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5202 (HB 5202-A) Page 10